California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) “Good standing” means the license or permit is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(c) “Oral conscious sedation” means a minimally depressed level of consciousness produced by oral medication that retains the
 patient’s ability to maintain independently and continuously an airway, and respond appropriately to physical stimulation or verbal command. “Oral conscious sedation” does not include dosages less than or equal to the single maximum recommended dose that can be prescribed for home use.

(1) The drugs and techniques used in oral conscious sedation shall have a margin of safety wide enough to render unintended loss of consciousness unlikely. Further, patients whose only response is reflex withdrawal from painful stimuli would not be considered to be in a state of oral conscious sedation.

(2) For the handicapped individual, incapable of the usually expected verbal response, a minimally depressed level of consciousness for that individual should be maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 21.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.19.

(a) A dentist may administer or order the administration of oral conscious sedation on an outpatient basis to an adult patient if the dentist possesses an active dentist license or permit issued under Section 1638 or 1640 and an active general anesthesia permit, moderate sedation permit, or adult oral conscious sedation certificate pursuant to Section 1647.20.

(b) An adult oral conscious sedation certificate shall expire on the date specified in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, unless it is renewed as provided in this article.

(c) This article shall not apply to the administration of local anesthesia or a mixture of nitrous oxide and oxygen,
 or to the administration, dispensing, or prescription of postoperative medications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 22.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.20.

A dentist who desires to administer, or order the administration of, oral conscious sedation for adult patients, who does not hold a general anesthesia permit, as provided in Sections 1646.1 and 1646.2, or a moderate sedation permit, as provided in Sections 1647.2 and 1647.3, shall possess a dentist license or a permit under Section 1638 or 1640 issued by the board that is in good standing, apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board, and submit the certification fee and evidence showing that the dentist satisfies any of the following requirements:

(a) Satisfactory completion of a postgraduate program in oral and maxillofacial surgery approved by either the Commission on Dental Accreditation or a comparable organization
 approved by the board.

(b) Satisfactory completion of a pediatric dental, periodontics, or general practice residency or other advanced education in a general dentistry program approved by the board.

(c) Satisfactory completion of a board-approved educational program on oral medications and sedation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 23.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.21.

A certificate holder shall be required to complete a minimum of seven hours of approved courses of study related to oral conscious sedation of adult patients as a condition of certification renewal as an oral conscious sedation provider. Those courses of study shall be accredited toward any continuing education required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.22.

(a) A physical evaluation and medical history shall be taken before the administration of oral conscious sedation to an adult. Records of the physical evaluation, medical history, and oral conscious sedation procedures used shall be maintained as required by the board regulations.

(b) A dentist who administers, or orders the administration of, oral conscious sedation for an adult patient shall be physically present in the treatment facility while the patient is sedated, and shall be present until discharge of the patient from the facility.

(c) The drugs and techniques used in oral conscious sedation to adults shall have a margin of safety wide enough to render
 unintended loss of consciousness unlikely.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 24.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.23.

The fee for an application for initial certification or renewal under this article shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover administration and enforcement costs incurred by the board in carrying out this article. The listed fee may be prorated based upon the date of the renewal of the dentist’s license or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.24.

Any office in which oral conscious sedation of adult patients is conducted pursuant to this article shall, unless otherwise provided by law, meet the facilities and equipment standards set forth by the board in regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.25.

A violation of any provision of this article constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the dentist’s permit, certificate, license, or all three, or the dentist may be reprimanded or placed on probation. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part I of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.26.

The sum of forty-seven thousand dollars ($47,000) is hereby appropriated for the 2005–06 fiscal year from the State Dentistry Fund to the Department of Consumer Affairs for the purpose of processing applications for adult conscious sedation certificates pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 539, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.87. Use of Pediatric Minimal Sedation [1647.30. - 1647.38.]

1647.30.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

 (a) “Minimal sedation” means a drug-induced state during which patients respond normally to verbal commands, and conforms to all of the following:

(1) Although cognitive function and coordination may be impaired, airway reflexes, ventilatory, and cardiovascular functions are unaffected.

(2) The drugs and techniques used in minimal sedation shall have a margin of safety wide enough to render unintended loss of consciousness unlikely. 

(3) Patients who require tactile stimulation to elicit a response to verbal commands shall not be
 considered to be in a state of minimal sedation.

(4) For the very young or developmentally delayed individual, incapable of the usually expected verbal response, a minimally depressed level of consciousness should be maintained.

(b) “Good standing” means the license or permit is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 25.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.31.

(a) A dentist may administer or order the administration of pediatric minimal sedation on an outpatient basis for pediatric dental patients under 13 years of age, if the dentist possesses an active dentist license or permit under Section 1630 or 1640 issued by the board and an active general anesthesia permit, moderate sedation permit with a pediatric endorsement, or a pediatric minimal sedation permit.

(b) A dentist who administers or orders the administration of pediatric minimal sedation shall be physically present in the treatment facility while the patient is sedated.

(c) A dentist with a pediatric minimal sedation permit shall possess the training, equipment, and supplies to rescue a patient
 from an unintended deeper level of sedation.

(d) This article does not apply to the administration of local anesthesia, moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 26.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.32.

(a) A dentist who desires to administer or order the administration of pediatric minimal sedation shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board. The dentist shall possess a dentist license or permit under Section 1638 or 1640 in good standing, submit an application fee, and produce evidence showing that the dentist has successfully completed training in pediatric minimal sedation that meets the requirements of subdivision (c).

(b) The application for a permit shall include documentation that equipment and drugs required by the board are on the premises.

(c) Training in the administration of pediatric minimal sedation shall be acceptable if it meets either of the following as
 approved by the board:

(1) Consists of at least 24 hours of pediatric minimal sedation instruction in addition to one clinical case. The pediatric minimal sedation instruction shall include training in pediatric monitoring, airway management, and resuscitation and patient rescue from moderate sedation.

(2) Completion of a residency accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) in pediatric dentistry.

(d) A dentist shall be limited to administering a single drug whose primary purpose is sedative via the oral route, either singly or in divided doses, not to exceed the manufacturer’s maximum recommended dose, plus a mix of nitrous oxide and oxygen and adjunctive agents such that the drugs either singly or in combination are unlikely to produce a state of unintended moderate sedation. This section shall not
 be construed to restrict the administration of adjunctive medication intended to relieve pain, affect the onset or duration of the primary sedative agent, or to reduce the side effects of sedation, including nausea or emesis.

(e) The operating dentist and a minimum of one additional personnel who are both trained in the monitoring and resuscitation of pediatric patients, as approved by the board, shall be present during the administration of minimal sedation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 27.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.33.

(a) The application fee for a pediatric minimal sedation permit or renewal under this article shall not exceed the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the board hire sufficient staff to administer the program and that the fees established pursuant to this section be equivalent to administration and enforcement costs incurred by the board in carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 9.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.36.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.34.

A violation of any provision of this article constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the dentist’s permit or license, or both. The proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 929, Sec. 9.   (SB 501)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 1647.36.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.35.

A pediatric minimal sedation permitholder shall be required to complete a minimum of seven hours of approved courses of study related to pediatric minimal sedation as a condition of renewal of the permit. Those courses of study shall be credited toward the total continuing education required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 29.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.36.

(a) A physical evaluation and medical history shall be taken before the administration of pediatric minimal sedation.

(b) Records of the physical evaluation, medical history, and pediatric minimal sedation procedures used shall be maintained as required by board regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 31.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.37.

A pediatric minimal sedation permit shall expire on the date specified in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, unless it is renewed as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 32.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.38.

An oral conscious sedation for minor patients permitholder who has a permit that was issued before January 1, 2022, that authorized the permitholder to administer or order the administration of oral conscious sedation for minor patients under prior Article 2.85 (commencing with Section 1647.10) may follow the terms of that existing permit until it expires. Any pediatric minimal sedation permit issued or renewed pursuant to this article on or after January 1, 2022, shall require the permitholder to follow the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 33.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.9. Dental Restorative Materials [1648.10. - 1648.20.]

1648.10.

(a) The Dental Board of California shall develop and distribute a fact sheet describing and comparing the risks and efficacy of the various types of dental restorative materials that may be used to repair a dental patient’s oral condition or defect. The fact sheet shall include:

(1) A description of the groups of materials that are available to the profession for restoration of an oral condition or defect.

(2) A comparison of the relative benefits and detriments of each group of materials.

(3) A comparison of the cost considerations associated with each
 group of materials.

(4) A reference to encourage discussion between patient and dentist regarding materials and to inform the patient of his or her options.

(b) The fact sheet shall be made available by the Dental Board of California to all licensed dentists.

(c) The Dental Board of California shall update the fact sheet described in subdivision (a) as determined necessary by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 9.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1648.15.

The fact sheet set forth by Section 1648.10 shall be provided by a dentist to every new patient and to patients of record prior to the performance of dental restoration work. The dentist needs to provide the fact sheet to each patient only once pursuant to the previous requirements of this section. An acknowledgment of the receipt of the fact sheet by the patient shall be signed by the patient and a copy of it shall be placed in the patient’s dental record. If updates to the fact sheet are made by the board, the updated fact sheet shall be given to patients in the manner provided above. A dentist shall also provide the fact sheet to the patient upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 532, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1648.20.

(a) This article shall not apply to any surgical, endodontic, periodontic, or orthodontic dental procedure in which dental restorative materials are not used.

(b) For purposes of this article, “dental restorative materials” means any structure or device placed into a patient’s mouth with the intent that it remain there for an indefinite period beyond the completion of the dental procedure, including material used for filling cavities in, or rebuilding or repairing the organic structure of, a tooth or teeth, but excluding synthesized structures or devices intended to wholly replace an extracted tooth or teeth, such as implants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration [1650. - 1657.]

1650.

Every person who is now or hereafter licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall register on forms prescribed by the board, his or her place of practice with the executive officer of the Dental Board of California, or, if he or she has more than one place of practice, all of the places of practice, or, if he or she has no place of practice, to so notify the executive officer of the board. A person licensed by the board shall register with the executive officer within 30 days after the date of his or her license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 10.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1650.1.

(a) Every applicant and licensee who has an electronic mail address shall report to the board that electronic mail address no later than July 1, 2016. The electronic mail address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure. 

(b) The board shall annually send an electronic notice to each applicant and licensee that requests confirmation from the applicant or licensee that his or her electronic mail address is current.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 510, Sec. 12.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Any dentist who removes his place of practice shall register each change made by him within one month after making said change. In the event any licensed dentist fails to notify the board of any change in the address of his place of practice within the time prescribed by this section, the board shall not renew such person’s license until the penalty fixed by this chapter is paid. An applicant for renewal of a license to practice dentistry shall specify in his application whether he has changed the address of his place of practice, and if so, the date of such change, and the board may accept such statement as evidence of such fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

The secretary shall issue a certificate of registration for each licentiate hereunder and for each office registered by such licentiate. The license and certificate may be offered as primary evidence in all courts of the facts therein stated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

Any licensed person who shall change his or her name according to law shall, within 10 days after that change, reregister with the executive officer of the board and the executive officer shall make a marginal note of the former name of the licentiate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 10.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1655.

Any failure on the part of any person holding such license to register it as directed for a period of six months after its issuance shall ipso facto work a forfeiture of his license, and it shall not be restored except upon the written application and payment to the board of the fee provided for restoration of license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 415.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.

On and after January 1, 1985, every dentist licensed to practice dentistry in the state and any person working in a dentist’s office who operates dental radiographic equipment shall meet at least one of the following requirements:

(a) Pass a course, approved by the board, in radiation safety which includes theory and clinical application in radiographic technique. The board shall require the courses to be taught by persons qualified in radiographic technique and shall adopt regulations specifying the qualifications for course instructors.

(b) Have passed a radiation safety examination conducted by the board prior to January 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1657.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Mobile dental unit” means a self-contained facility, which may include a trailer or van, in which dentistry is practiced that may be moved, towed, or transported from one location to another.

(2) “Portable dental unit” means a self-contained unit housing equipment used for providing dental treatment that is transported to, and used on a temporary basis at, nondental office locations.

(b) A
 mobile dental unit, or a dental practice that routinely uses portable dental units to provide treatment in nondental office locations, shall be registered and operated in accordance with regulations established by the board. These regulations shall not be designed to prevent or lessen competition in service areas. The regulations shall require the registrant to identify a licensed dentist
 responsible for the mobile dental unit or portable practice, and shall include, but shall not be limited to, requirements for availability of followup and emergency care, maintenance and availability of provider and patient records, and treatment information to be provided to patients and other appropriate parties. A mobile dental unit, or a dental practice using portable dental units, registered and operated in accordance with the board’s regulations and that has paid the fees established by the board, including a mobile dental unit registered for the purpose specified in subdivision (e), shall otherwise be
 exempt from this article and Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1658).

(c) A mobile service unit, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1765.105 of the Health and Safety Code, and a mobile dental unit or portable dental unit operated by an entity that is exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, are exempt from this article and Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1658). Notwithstanding this exemption, the owner or operator of the mobile unit shall notify the board within 60 days of the date on which dental services are first delivered in the mobile unit, or the date on which the mobile unit’s application pursuant to Section 1765.130 of the Health and Safety Code is approved, whichever is earlier.

(d) A licensee practicing in a mobile unit described in subdivision (c) is not subject to subdivision (b) as to that mobile unit.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 1625, a licensed dentist shall be permitted to operate a mobile dental unit provided by his or her property and casualty insurer as a temporary substitute site for the
 practice registered by him or her pursuant to Section 1650 as long as both of the following apply:

(1) The licensed dentist’s registered place of practice has been rendered and remains unusable due to loss or calamity.

(2) The licensee’s insurer registers the mobile dental unit with the board in compliance with subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   (SB 562)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Additional Offices [1658. - 1658.8.]

1658.

(a) (1) When a licensee desires to have more than one place of practice, the licensee shall, prior to the opening of the additional office, apply to the board, pay the fee required by this chapter, and receive permission in writing from the board to have the additional place of practice.

(2) “Place of practice” means any dental office where any act of dentistry is practiced as defined by Section 1625, and includes a place of practice in which the applicant holds any proprietary interest of any nature whatsoever, or in which the licensee holds any right to participate in the management or control thereof. A dentist who is the
 lessor of a dental office shall not be deemed to hold a proprietary interest in that place of practice, unless the dentist is entitled to participate in the management or control of the dentistry practiced there.

(b) This section shall not apply to a licensee who practices dentistry outside the licensee’s registered place of practice in any of the following places:

(1) Facilities licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(2) Licensed health facilities as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Clinics that are licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of, or that are exempt from licensure under subdivision (b), (c), or
 (h) of Section 1206 of, the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Licensed community care facilities as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Schools of any grade level, whether public or private.

(6) Public institutions, including, but not limited to, federal, state, and local penal and correctional facilities.

(7) Mobile units that are operated by a public or governmental agency or a nonprofit or charitable organization and are approved by the board, provided that the mobile units meet all statutory or regulatory requirements.

(8) The home of a nonambulatory patient when a physician or registered
 nurse has provided a written note that the patient is
 unable to visit a dental office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 40.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.1.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a licensed dentist from maintaining more than one dental office in this state if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) In addition to any existing legal responsibility or liability, a dentist maintaining more than one office shall assume legal responsibility and liability for the dental services rendered in each of the offices maintained by the dentist.

(b) A dentist maintaining more than one office shall ensure that each office is in compliance with the supervision requirements of this chapter.

(c) A dentist maintaining more than one office shall post, in an area which is likely to be seen by all patients who use the facility, a sign with the dentist’s name, mailing address, telephone number, and dental license number.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.2.

(a) “Additional place of practice,” as used in this article, means any place of practice that increases the number of places of practice of the applicant, and includes an additional office that the applicant proposes to originally establish, either individually or in association with another, as well as an established place of practice that the applicant acquires or proposes to acquire, in whole or in part, by purchase, repossession, reassignment, gift, devise, bequest, or operation of law, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(b) A practice location described in subdivision (b) of Section 1658 does not constitute an additional place of practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 347, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.3.

Nothing in this article shall limit or authorize the board to limit the number of additional places of practice authorized by the board, which are in operation on October 1, 1961, and which conform to the provisions of this article, nor prevent or limit a licensee from acquiring from his parent, by sale, transfer, assignment, gift, succession, bequest, or operation of law, whether heretofore or hereafter made, prior to January 1, 1968 or the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted by the Legislature at the 1967 Regular Session, whichever date occurs later, and from operating any additional office or offices of his parent so acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1402.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.4.

The transfer after October 1, 1961, of any additional office from one licentiate to another, other than as authorized by this article, shall terminate the privilege of operating such additional office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.5.

The transfer of the location of one additional office to a new location within the same county shall not be considered the establishment of a new additional office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.6.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this article relating to the operation of additional offices shall be a ground for the suspension or revocation of the permission granted by the board to operate such additional office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.7.

The board shall have the power to carry out the provisions of this article by uniform rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a licensed dentist may operate a mobile dental unit provided by his or her property and casualty insurer as a temporary substitute site for the practice registered by him or her pursuant to Section 1650, if both of the following requirements are met:

(a) The licensee’s registered place of practice has been rendered and remains unusable due to loss or calamity.

(b) The licensee’s insurer registers the unit with the board in compliance with Section 1657.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 464, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Suspension and Revocation of Licenses [1670. - 1687.]

1670.

Any licentiate may have his license revoked or suspended or be reprimanded or be placed on probation by the board for unprofessional conduct, or incompetence, or gross negligence, or repeated acts of negligence in his or her profession, or for the issuance of a license by mistake, or for any other cause applicable to the licentiate provided in this chapter. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.1.

(a) Any licentiate under this chapter may have his or her license revoked or suspended or be reprimanded or be placed on probation by the board for conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a dentist or dental assistant licensed under this chapter, in which case the record of conviction or a certified copy thereof, certified by the clerk of the court or by the judge in whose court the conviction is had, shall be conclusive evidence.

(b) The board shall undertake proceedings under this section upon the receipt of a certified copy of the record of conviction. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony or of any misdemeanor substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a dentist or dental assistant licensed under this chapter is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under any provision of the Penal Code, including, but not limited to, Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, allowing such person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any proceeding initiated by the board against a licensee for the violation of any provision of this chapter shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within seven years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging fraud or willful misrepresentation is not subject to the limitation in subdivision (a).

(c) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging unprofessional conduct based on incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts of the licensee is not subject to the limitation in subdivision (a) upon proof that the licensee intentionally concealed from discovery his or her incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts.

(d) If an alleged act or omission involves any conduct described in subdivision (e) of Section 1680 committed on a minor, the seven-year limitations period in subdivision (a) and the 10-year limitations period in subdivision (e) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority.

(e) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging conduct described in subdivision (e) of Section 1680 not committed on a minor shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall apply to a complaint alleging conduct received by the board on and after January 1, 2005.

(f) In any allegation, accusation, or proceeding described in this section, the limitations period in subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the period during which material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1671.

The board may discipline a licentiate by placing him or her on probation under various terms and conditions, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring the licentiate to obtain additional training or pass an examination upon completion of training, or both. The examination may be written, oral, or both, and may be a practical or clinical examination or both, at the option of the board.

(b) Requiring the licentiate to submit to a complete diagnostic examination by one or more physicians appointed by the board, if warranted by the physical or mental condition of the licentiate. If the board requires the licentiate to submit to such an examination, the board shall receive and consider any other report of a complete diagnostic examination given by one or more physicians of the licentiate’s choice.

(c) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope or type of practice of the licentiate.

(d) Requiring restitution of fees to the licentiate’s patients or payers of services unless such restitution has already been made.

(e) Providing the option of alternative community service in lieu of all or part of a period of suspension in cases other than violations relating to quality of care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

(a) When the board disciplines a licensee by placing him or her on probation, the board may, in addition to the terms and conditions described in Section 1671, require the licensee to pay the monetary costs associated with monitoring the licensee’s probation.

(b) The board shall not renew the license of a licensee who fails to pay all of the costs he or she is ordered to pay pursuant to this section once the licensee has served his or her term of probation.

(c) The board shall not reinstate a license if the petitioner has failed to pay any costs he or she was ordered to pay pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1673.

(a) On and after July 1, 2020, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the board shall require a licensee to provide to a patient or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate a separate disclosure that includes the licensee’s probation status, the length of the probation, the probation end date, all practice restrictions placed on the licensee by the board, the board’s telephone number, and an explanation of how the patient can find further information on the licensee’s probation on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information internet website. The disclosure shall be provided before the patient’s first visit following the probationary order while the licensee is on probation pursuant to
 a probationary order made on and after July 1, 2020, in any of the following
 circumstances:

(1) A final adjudication by the board following an administrative hearing or admitted findings or prima facie showing in a stipulated settlement establishing any of the following:

(A) The commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient or client as defined in Section 726 or 729.

(B) Drug or alcohol abuse directly resulting in harm to patients or the extent that such use impairs the ability of the licensee to practice safely.

(C) Criminal conviction directly involving harm to patient health.

(D) Inappropriate prescribing resulting in harm to
 patients and a probationary period of five years or more.

(2) An accusation or statement of issues alleged that the licensee committed any of the acts described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1), and a stipulated settlement based upon a nolo contendere or other similar compromise that does not include any prima facie showing or admission of guilt or fact, but does include an express acknowledgment that the disclosure requirements of this section would serve to protect the public interest.

(b) A licensee required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) shall
 obtain from the patient, or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate, a separate, signed copy of that disclosure.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) if any of the following apply:
